Windows-l10n-central/lv/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/lv_LV.aff
SFX a Y 146
SFX a t  os     [^beīkps]t   is:1vta0
SFX a 0  ies    [^beīkps]t   is:0xta0
SFX a t  ies    [^beīgkps]t  is:2vta0
SFX a t  as     [^beīkps]t   is:3xta0
SFX a t  amies  [^beīkps]t   is:1dta0
SFX a t  aties  [^beīkps]t   is:2dta0
SFX a t  ieties [^beīgkps]t  is:2dtap
SFX a t  oties  [^beīkps]t   is:0xtaa
SFX a t  as/]|  [^beīkps]t   is:0xtav
SFX a gt dzies     [g]t      is:2vta0
SFX a gt dzieties  [g]t      is:2dtap
SFX a 0  ies      [^ē]kt   is:0xta0
SFX a t  os       [^ē]kt   is:1vta0
SFX a t  as       [^ē]kt   is:3xta0
SFX a t  amies    [^ē]kt   is:1dta0
SFX a t  aties    [^ē]kt   is:2dta0
SFX a t  oties    [^ē]kt   is:0xtaa
SFX a kt  cies    [^ē]kt   is:2vta0
SFX a kt  cieties [^ē]kt   is:2dtap
SFX a t  as/]|    [^ē]kt   is:0xtav
SFX a 0   ies      [ē]kt   is:0xta0
SFX a ēkt ecos     [ē]kt   is:1vta0
SFX a ēkt ecas     [ē]kt   is:3xta0
SFX a ēkt ecos     [ē]kt   is:1vta0
SFX a ēkt ecamies  [ē]kt   is:1dta0
SFX a ēkt ecaties  [ē]kt   is:2dta0
SFX a ēkt ecoties  [ē]kt   is:0xtaa
SFX a ēkt ecieties [ē]kt   is:2dtap
SFX a ēkt ecas/]|  [ē]kt   is:0xtav
SFX a 0    ies      [ē]bt   is:0xta0
SFX a ēbt  ebjos    [ē]bt   is:1vta0
SFX a ēbt  ebies    [ē]bt   is:2vta0
SFX a ēbt  ebjas    [ē]bt   is:3xta0
SFX a ēbt  ebjamies [ē]bt   is:1dta0
SFX a ēbt  ebjaties [ē]bt   is:2dta0
SFX a ēbt  ebieties [ē]bt   is:2dtap
SFX a ēbt  ebjoties [ē]bt   is:0xtaa
SFX a ēbt  ebjas/]| [ē]bt   is:0xtav
SFX a 0    ies    [e]pt   is:0xta0
SFX a t    os     [e]pt   is:1vta0
SFX a t    ies    [e]pt   is:2vta0
SFX a t    as     [e]pt   is:3xta0
SFX a t    amies  [e]pt   is:1dta0
SFX a t    aties  [e]pt   is:2dta0
SFX a t    ieties [e]pt   is:2dtap
SFX a t    oties  [e]pt   is:0xtaa
SFX a t    as/]|  [e]pt   is:0xtav
SFX a 0    ies      [u]pt   is:0xta0
SFX a upt  ūpos     [u]pt   is:1vta0
SFX a upt  ūpie     [u]pt   is:2vta0
SFX a upt  ūpas     [u]pt   is:3xta0
SFX a upt  ūpamies  [u]pt   is:1dta0
SFX a upt  ūpaties  [u]pt   is:2dta0
SFX a upt  ūpieties [u]pt   is:2dtap
SFX a upt  ūpoties  [u]pt   is:0xtaa
SFX a upt  ūpas/]|  [u]pt   is:0xtav
SFX a 0  ies    [^aēiīur]st  is:0xta0
SFX a t  os     [^aēiīur]st  is:1vta0
SFX a t  ies    [^aēiīur]st  is:0vta0
SFX a t  as     [^aēiīur]st  is:3xta0
SFX a t  amies  [^aēiīur]st  is:1dta0
SFX a t  aties  [^aēiīur]st  is:2dta0
SFX a t  ieties [^aēiīur]st  is:2dtap
SFX a t  oties  [^aēiīur]st  is:0xtaa
SFX a t  as/]|  [^aēiīur]st  is:0xtav
SFX a 0   ies     [r]st    is:0xta0
SFX a st  šos     [r]st    is:1vta0
SFX a st  ties    [r]st    is:2vta0
SFX a st  šas     [r]st    is:3xta0
SFX a st  šamies  [r]st    is:1dta0
SFX a st  šaties  [r]st    is:2dta0
SFX a st  tieties [r]st    is:2dtap
SFX a st  šoties  [r]st    is:0xtaa
SFX a st  šas/]|  [r]st    is:0xtav
SFX a 0   ies      [a]st   is:0xta0
SFX a ast otos     [a]st   is:1vta0
SFX a ast oties    [a]st   is:2vta0
SFX a ast otas     [a]st   is:3xta0
SFX a ast otamies  [a]st   is:1dta0
SFX a ast otaties  [a]st   is:2dta0
SFX a ast otieties [a]st   is:2dtap
SFX a ast ototies  [a]st   is:0xtaa
SFX a ast otas/]|  [a]st   is:0xtav
SFX a 0   ies       [ī]st   is:0xta0
SFX a īst ienos     [ī]st   is:1vta0
SFX a īst ienies    [ī]st   is:2vta0
SFX a īst ienas     [ī]st   is:3xta0
SFX a īst ienamies  [ī]st   is:1dta0
SFX a īst ienaties  [ī]st   is:2dta0
SFX a īst ienieties [ī]st   is:2dtap
SFX a īst ienoties  [ī]st   is:0xtaa
SFX a īst ienas/]|  [ī]st   is:0xtav
SFX a 0  ies      [ģ]ist  is:0xta0
SFX a st edos     [ģ]ist  is:1vta0
SFX a st edies    [ģ]ist  is:2vta0
SFX a st edas     [ģ]ist  is:3xta0
SFX a st edamies  [ģ]ist  is:1dta0
SFX a st edaties  [ģ]ist  is:2dta0
SFX a st edieties [ģ]ist  is:2dtap
SFX a st edoties  [ģ]ist  is:0xtaa
SFX a st edas/]|  [ģ]ist  is:0xtav
SFX a 0  ies       [ķ]ist  is:0xta0
SFX a st etos      [ķ]ist  is:1vta0
SFX a st eties     [ķ]ist  is:2vta0
SFX a st etas      [ķ]ist  is:3xta0
SFX a st etamies   [ķ]ist  is:1dta0
SFX a st etaties   [ķ]ist  is:2dta0
SFX a st etieties  [ķ]ist  is:2dtap
SFX a st etoties   [ķ]ist  is:0xtaa
SFX a st etas/]|   [ķ]ist  is:0xtav
SFX a 0  ies      [r]ist  is:0xta0
SFX a st enos     [r]ist  is:1vta0
SFX a st enies    [r]ist  is:2vta0
SFX a st enas     [r]ist  is:3xta0
SFX a st enamies  [r]ist  is:1dta0
SFX a st enaties  [r]ist  is:2dta0
SFX a st enieties [r]ist  is:2dtap
SFX a st enoties  [r]ist  is:0xtaa
SFX a st enas/]|  [r]ist  is:0xtav
SFX a 0   ies     [i]et   is:0xta0
SFX a iet ejos    [i]et   is:1vta0
SFX a iet ejies    [i]et   is:2vta0
SFX a iet ejas     [i]et   is:3xta0
SFX a iet ejamies  [i]et   is:1dta0
SFX a iet ejaties  [i]et   is:2dta0
SFX a iet ejieties [i]et   is:2dtap
SFX a iet ejoties  [i]et   is:0xtaa
SFX a iet ejas/]|  [i]et   is:0xtav
SFX a 0  ies      [mrv]īt   is:0xta0
SFX a īt ijos     [mrv]īt   is:1vta0
SFX a īt ijies    [mrv]īt   is:2vta0
SFX a īt ijas     [mrv]īt   is:3xta0
SFX a īt ijamies  [mrv]īt   is:1dta0
SFX a īt ijaties  [mrv]īt   is:2dta0
SFX a īt ijieties [mrv]īt   is:2dtap
SFX a īt ijoties  [mrv]īt   is:0xtaa
SFX a īt ijas/]|  [mrv]īt   is:0xtav
SFX a 0  ies      [d]zīt   is:0xta0
SFX a īt enos     [d]zīt   is:1vta0
SFX a īt enies    [d]zīt   is:2vta0
SFX a īt enas     [d]zīt   is:3xta0
SFX a īt enamies  [d]zīt   is:1dta0
SFX a īt enaties  [d]zīt   is:2dta0
SFX a īt enieties [d]zīt   is:2dtap
SFX a īt enoties  [d]zīt   is:0xtaa
SFX a īt enas/]|  [d]zīt   is:0xtav
